Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.110

Parole.

(1) The board may permit an offender convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984, to leave the buildings and enclosures of a state correctional institution on parole, after such convicted person has served the period of confinement fixed for him or her by the board, less time credits for good behavior and diligence in work: PROVIDED, That in no case shall an inmate be credited with more than one-third of his or her sentence as fixed by the board.

The board may establish rules and regulations under which an offender may be allowed to leave the confines of a state correctional institution on parole, and may return such person to the confines of the institution from which he or she was paroled, at its discretion.

(2) The board may permit an offender convicted of a crime committed on or after September 1, 2001, and sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507, to leave a state correctional institution on community custody according to the provisions of RCW 9.94A.507, 9.94A.704, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440. The person may be returned to the institution following a violation of his or her conditions of release to community custody pursuant to the hearing provisions of RCW 9.95.435.

[ 2009 c 28 s 26; 2008 c 231 s 42; 2003 c 218 s 7; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 331; 1999 c 143 s 21; 1955 c 133 s 12. Prior: 1939 c 142 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 4, part; RRS s 10249-4, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Application—Application of repealers—Effective date—2008 c 231: See notes following RCW 9.94A.701.

Severability—2008 c 231: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.